sl-SI: Vrsta kompleta za ustvarjanja z iglo: Kvačkanje; Križni šiv; Vezenje; Pletenje; Prešivanje; Šivanje; Drugo
es: Tipo de kit de bordado: Ganchillo; Punto de cruz; Bordados; Tejeduría; Colchas; Costura; Otros
el: Τύπος σετ ραπτικής: Κροσέ; Σταυροβελονιά; Κέντημα; Πλέξιμο; Καπιτονέ; Ράψιμο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ súpravy na vyšívanie: Háčkovanie; Krížikový steh; Vyšívanie; Pletenie; Prešívanie; Šitie; Iné
tr: İğne işi kiti tipi: Tığ işi; Kanaviçe; Nakış; Örgü örmek; Kapitone; Dikiş; Diğer
pl: Rodzaj zestawu do haftu gobelinowego: Szydełko; Ścieg krzyżykowy; Haft; Dziewiarstwo; Pikowanie tkanin; Szycie; Inne
fi: Ompelusetin tyyppi: Virkkaus; Ristipisto; Kirjonta; Neulominen; Täkkien valmistus; Ompelu; Muu
ko: 수예품 키트 타입: 코바늘; 십자수; 자수; 대바늘뜨기; 퀼팅; 재봉; 기타
nb: Nåletøysettype: Hekling; Korssting; Broderi; Strikking; Quilting; Sying; Annet
it: Tipo di kit per ricamo: Uncinetto; Punto croce; Ricamo; Maglieria; Impuntitura; Cucito; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de kits para trabalhos com agulhas: Croché; Ponto de cruz; Bordados; Tricô; Acolchoamento; Costura; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de kit de agulha: Crochê; Ponto cruz; Bordado; Tricô; Acolchoado; De costura; Outro
zh-CN: 针线包类型: 钩编; 十字绣; 刺绣; 针织; 绗缝; 缝纫; 其他
de: Art des Handarbeitssets: Häkeln; Kreuzstich; Stickerei; Stricken; Steppen; Nähen; Sonstiges
cs: Typ vyšívací sady: Háčkování; Křížkové vyšívání; Vyšívání; Pletení; Prošívání; Šití; Jiné
da: Type af stramajbroderisæt: Hækle; Korssting; Broderi; Strikning; Quilting; Syning; Andet
zh-TW: 縫紉工具組類型: 鉤針編織; 十字繡; 刺繡; 針織; 絎縫; 縫紉; 其他
sv: Typ av broderikit: Virkning; Korsstygn; Broderi; Stickning; Kviltning; Sömnad; Övrigt
ru: Тип набора для вышивания: Вязание крючком; Вышивка крестом; Вышивка; Вязание; Лоскутное шитье; Шитье; Другое
en: Needlecraft kit type: Crochet; Cross stitch; Embroidery; Knitting; Quilting; Sewing; Other
bg-BG: Тип комплект за ръкоделие: Плетене на една кука; Кръстат бод; Бродерия; Плетене; Капитониране; Шиене; Други
lt-LT: Nėrimo, mezgimo ir siuvinėjimo rinkinio tipas: Nėrimo; Siuvinėjimo kryželiu; Siuvinėjimo; Mezgimo; Dygsniavimo; Siuvimo; Kita
vi: Loại bộ dụng cụ may vá: Đan móc; Thêu chữ thập; Thêu; Đan; May chần; Khâu vá; Khác
ro-RO: Tip trusă de cusut: Croșetat; Punct de cruciuliță; Broderie; Tricotat; Matlasare; Cusut; Altele
th: ประเภทชุดอุปกรณ์งานเย็บปักถักร้อย: โครเชต์; ครอสติช; การปักผ้า; การถักนิตติง; การควิลท์; เย็บผ้า; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de kit de travaux d’aiguille: Crochet; Point de croix; Broderie; Tricot; Piquage; Couture; Autre
hu: Kézimunkakészlet típusa: Horgolás; Keresztöltés; Hímzés; Kötés; Foltvarrás; Varrás; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta pribora za ručni rad: Heklanje; Križni bod; Vezenje; Pletenje; Prošivanje; Šivanje; Ostalo
ja: ニードルクラフトキットタイプ: かぎ針編み; クロスステッチ; 刺繍; 編み物; キルティング; ソーイング; その他
nl: Type borduurpakketten: Haken; Kruissteek; Borduurwerk; Breien; Quilten; Naaien; Andere